Illinois, session 104th, SB1062.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Illinois Library System Act is amended by 5changing Section 1.1 as follows: 6    (75 ILCS 10/1.1)  (from Ch. 81, par. 111.1)7    Sec. 1.1. This Act may be cited as the the Illinois Library 8System Act.9(Source: P.A. 86-1475.)